Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 37 Declaratory Judgments

Cross references. —

As to judgments generally, see chapter 16 of this title.

As to enforcement of judgments generally, see chapter 17 of this title.

For another provision concerning declaratory judgments, see Rule 57, W.R.C.P.

Court will not render advisory opinion on matter not ripe for declaratory judgment.

Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

As where official administrative action not taken on issue.
—

The insurance commissioner cannot ask the court to advise him relative to which of two actions he should take in connection with the requirement of allocation of premiums on policies covering multi-state risks where he has not taken official administrative action on the issue one way or the other. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

A justiciable controversy must exist

before a court may grant declaratory relief, and court should not hear a case where there has been a change in circumstances occurring either before or after a case has been filed that eliminates the controversy. Southwestern Pub. Serv. Co. v. Thunder Basin Coal Co., 978 P.2d 1138,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1999).

Declaratory judgment action, filed beyond 30 days from driver
license revocation, properly considered. —

Declaratory judgment and mandamus actions filed by drivers whose licenses had been revoked, challenging the interpretation by the department of motor vehicles of the statute upon which the department relied in refusing to restore the drivers' driving privileges, even though filed beyond 30 days from the rulings by independent hearing officers revoking the licenses, were properly considered by the district court. State v. Kraus, 706 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1985).

Requirements for jury trial in declaratory judgment action depend on nature of case.

Where the nature of the case primarily was equitable, the district court was not required to grant a jury trial. Ferguson v. Ferguson, 739 P.2d 754,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 469

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

Enron Oil & Gas Co. v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 820 P.2d 977,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Dickerson v. City Council, 582 P.2d 80,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1978); Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978); Farr v. Link, 746 P.2d 431,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 551

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For a note, “Basic Misconceptions of the Declaratory Judgment Law,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 66.

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Extent to which res judicata principles apply to actions for declaratory relief, 10 ALR2d 782.

Jury trial, 13 ALR2d 777.

Burden of proof, 23 ALR2d 1243.

Negligence cases, 28 ALR2d 957.

Partnership or joint venture matters, 32 ALR2d 970.

Title or right to office in unincorporated private association, 82 ALR2d 1169.

Validity or existence of common-law marriage, 92 ALR2d 1102.

26 C.J.S. Declaratory Judgments § 1 et seq.

§ 1-37-101.
Short title.

“This act” means W.S.

1-37-101

through

1-37-115

and may be cited as the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act.

History:

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 16; R.S. 1931, § 89-2416; C.S. 1945, § 3-5816; W.S. 1957, § 1-1049; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-38-101

; § 1; Laws 2014, ch. 79, §
1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

Section

1-37-114

, referred to in this section, was renumbered as §

1-37-115

in 1977. See editor's notes following §

1-37-106

.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “through

1-37-115

” for “through

1-37-114

.”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Referendum disputes. —

When a voter
contested a city clerk's rejection of signatures on a municipal referendum
petition, a district court had jurisdiction to hear the voter's declaratory
judgment suit under Wyo. R. App. P. 12.12 and the Uniform Declaratory
Judgments Act (Act), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-101

et seq., because the “right” to be declared
was within the Act's scope, and the voter was an “interested
person.” City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

Justiciability. —

Whether a city had to negotiate with a firefighters' union in executive session, unless the union consented to public negotiations, was not justiciable because the city council had not yet had the opportunity to decide whether to conduct the negotiations in executive session. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

Whether negotiations exchanged between a firefighters' union and a city were public records was not justiciable because the city had not yet been able to decide whether to conduct negotiations in executive session, so there was not yet a basis to determine if the exemption in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-405(b) applied. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

Exchange of school lands. —

A controversy over the constitutionality of exchanges of state lands without a public auction involved precisely the type of circumstance contemplated by the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, for (1) this controversy impacted many stakeholders, including state-school-land lessees, the beneficiaries of the funds generated by state school lands, the legislature which had adopted statutes authorizing exchanges, those members of the executive branch of state government whose responsibility was to steward the state school lands, and the public at large; and (2) as inevitable growth and development increased the pressure on Wyoming state lands, the need for certainty and clarity regarding this aspect of the management of state lands grew.Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Merbanco, Inc., 2003 WY 73, 70 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. July 10, 2003).

Applied

in

Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1962); Cheyenne Nat'l Bank v. Citizens Sav. Bank, 391 P.2d 933,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1964); State ex rel. Sheehan v. District Court, 426 P.2d 431,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1967); Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975); Wyoming Nat'l Abortion Rights Action League v. Karpan, 881 P.2d 281,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961); Merrill v. Bishop, 69 Wyo. 45, 237 P.2d 186,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1951); MacGuire v. Sturgis, 347 F. Supp. 580, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13022 (D. Wyo. 1971); First Nat'l Bank & Trust Co. v. Brimmer, 504 P.2d 1367,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1973); Jackson v. Wyoming State Treas. ex. rel. Workmen's Comp. Dep't, 521 P.2d 571,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 1974); Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974); State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981); Union Pac. Resources Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 895 P.2d 464,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1995); Thompson-Green v. Estate of Drobish, 2006 WY 126, 143 P.3d 897,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(2006); Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Mar. 19, 2015); Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Sept. 30, 2015); Inman v. Inman (In re Estate of Inman), 2016 WY 101, 382 P.3d 67,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 1-37-102.
Scope and general consideration.

Courts of record within
their respective jurisdictions may declare rights, status and other
legal relations whether or not further relief is or could be claimed.
No proceeding is open to objection on the ground that a declaratory
judgment or decree is prayed for. The declaration may be either affirmative
or negative in form and effect, and such declarations shall have the
effect of a final judgment.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 50, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 89-2401; C.S. 1945, § 3-5801; W.S. 1957, § 1-1051; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-38-102

.

Constitutionality. —

This chapter is constitutional, as against contention that it conferred nonjudicial power on courts. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Construction. —

To accomplish its purpose, the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act is to be liberally construed and administered. Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

Nature of action. —

Right conferred hereby, although legal right under law, is equitable in nature, since actions hereunder are in nature of “bills of peace.” Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Standing. —

Trial court properly determined that appellees had standing to file a complaint pursuant to the Wyoming Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act for a declaration that appellants did not have authority to block their use of a public easement to access their property because appellees owned substantial property in the subdivision containing the public easement.
Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2012).

Equitable nature. —

Action for declaratory relief is essentially equitable in character. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Time limitations. —

Inasmuch as a declaratory judgment act is available to a party as an independent action, separate and apart from a petition for review, the time in which a petition for review must be filed is immaterial. Wyo. Cmty. College Comm'n v. Casper Cmty. College Dist., 2001 WY 86, 31 P.3d 1242,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2001).

“Proper parties.” —

Persons interested in action under the provisions of this chapter, are at least “proper parties.” Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Joinder. —

Equitable principle that, to avoid multiplicity of suits, joinder is permitted when community of interest in facts and law exists, applies to actions at law under provisions of this chapter. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Former use of general demurrer. —

Either statute of limitations or doctrine of laches may properly be raised by general demurrer (now motion) to petition for declaratory judgment. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Good purpose served. —

There is no reason to bring an action for a declaratory judgment unless some good purpose will be served thereby. Beatty v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 49 Wyo. 22, 52 P.2d 404,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1935).

To justify an action under this chapter, some useful purpose must be accomplished thereby. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Anticipated disputes not adjudicated. —

This section gives the courts no power to determine future rights or anticipated disputes or controversies and must treat them as existing and genuine. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Advisory opinions. —

It is axiomatic that the Declaratory Judgments Act cannot be relied upon to secure an advisory opinion. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974); Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Hallmark Ins. Co., 561 P.2d 706,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1977).

Modify decree or judgment. —

Action for declaratory judgment may not be invoked to modify a judicial decree or judgment. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Existence of another adequate remedy will not, of itself, preclude declaratory judgment relief.

Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

Other relief not precluded. —

That plaintiff sought declaration of rights under this chapter, did not preclude other relief appropriate to what purported to be action in equity. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Declaratory judgment should not be used to usurp or replace specific administrative relief,

particularly when the initial decision is committed to an administrative body. City of Cheyenne v. Sims, 521 P.2d 1347,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1974).

There is restriction on availability of declaratory judgment action to administrative matters.

Where the action would result in a prejudging of issues that should be decided in the first instance by an administrative body, it should not lie. This restriction on the scope of declaratory judgments is akin to the requirement that administrative remedies must be exhausted before judicial relief is available. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

Prescriptive public easement. —

Declaratory judgment action filed by the County of Washakie was not the appropriate means to establish a prescriptive public easement because, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-1-101

, the legislature established a specific statutory procedure that required such claims to be brought initially before the board of county commissioners. Ten Broek v. County of Washakie, 2003 WY 164, 82 P.3d 269,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2003).

Action entertained where relief concerns construction or interpretation
of regulations or statute. —

Where the desired relief concerns the validity and construction of agency regulations, or where it concerns the constitutionality or interpretation of a statute upon which the administrative action is, or is to be, based, the action should be entertained. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982); State Bd. of Equalization v. Jackson Hole Ski Corp., 737 P.2d 350,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 745 P.2d 58,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 574

(Wyo. 1987).

Questions already adjudicated. —

Questions already adjudicated by court having jurisdiction of subject matter and parties, cannot thereafter be subject, between such parties and their privies, of a declaratory judgment action. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Justiciable controversy necessary. —

In order that declaratory relief may be obtained, it is jurisdictional requisite that petition disclose justiciable controversy. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944); Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Hallmark Ins. Co., 561 P.2d 706,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1977); White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Before the district court may grant declaratory relief, a justiciable controversy must exist. West Tex. Utils. Co. v. Exxon Coal USA, 807 P.2d 932,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1991).

Trial court properly dismissed property owners'
declaratory judgment action against the State Engineer and the Board of Control because the action was not justiciable; even if the case presented a matter of great public importance, the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-37-101

through

1-37-115

, did not extend the jurisdiction of the district court, and the property owners failed to show that any relief would have a practical effect on them.
William F. West Ranch, LLC v. Tyrrell, 2009 WY 62, 206 P.3d 722,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2009).

There was no justiciable controversy before the district court with respect to the association’s claims for declaratory relief because it never brought any claims with respect to the individual defendant’s removal of two signs; there was never any attempt by the association to install informational signage within the platted easements, nor any allegations that the ranch or its fence prevented the association from doing so; the association’s complaint contained no allegations concerning directional or other signage; and the association made no allegations concerning the need to install above ground utilities and communication facilities within the platted easements, or that the ranch’s fence or other actions prevented such installation. Johnson Cty. Ranch Improvement #1, LLC v. Goddard, 2020 WY 115, 471 P.3d 307,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2020).

And must be based on facts. —

Claim that actual or justiciable controversy exists must be based upon facts pleaded or established. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

On face of pleading. —

If it appears on face of pleading that no justiciable controversy is presented, general demurrer (now motion) is proper. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

No justiciable controversy as contemplated by Declaratory Judgments Act exists where it appears on face of pleading that facts alleged disclose that either statute of limitations or doctrine of laches is applicable thereto. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Where under deeds or contracts operating companies sought to collect from landowners “pro rata share of expense of defending suit,” but no facts were alleged indicating that controversy had arisen, court properly refused to determine matter by declaratory judgment. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

A clear statement of the necessary elements of a justiciable controversy

under the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act is: first, a justiciable controversy requires parties having existing and genuine, as distinguished from theoretical, rights or interests. Second, the controversy must be one upon which the judgment of the court may effectively operate, as distinguished from a debate or an argument evoking a purely political, administrative, philosophical or academic conclusion. Third, it must be a controversy the judicial determination of which will have the force and effect of a final judgment in law or decree in equity upon the rights, status or other legal relationships of one or more of the real parties in interest, or, wanting these qualities be of such great and overriding public moment as to constitute the legal equivalent of all of them. Finally, the proceedings must be genuinely adversary in character and not a mere disputation, but advanced with sufficient militancy to engender a thorough research and analysis of the major issues. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974); Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Hallmark Ins. Co., 561 P.2d 706,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1977); Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

But there is a well-recognized exception

that the rule requiring the existence of justiciable controversies is not followed or is relaxed in matters of great public interest or importance. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974); Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

The right to seek public office for which one has proper qualifications is a fundamental right such as to be a question of great public importance and thus properly falls within the exception to the declaratory judgment rule requiring the existence of a justiciable controversy. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

A dispute may be a “friendly” one

where parties may have agreed to submit a question to courts for determination, and this is in and of itself no valid objection to the rendition of a declaratory judgment if the basic elements necessary as the basis of a declaratory judgment action are present and if the same is sustainable of judicial determination and adjudication of a present right. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Actual controversy not raised. —

Where there is an existing and unappealed order of the state land board granting to appellants an unexercised preference right to purchase state land and under which they claim, the first count of the board's complaint attacking its own ruling did not raise an actual controversy within the strictures of the Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act, and the district court lacked jurisdiction to properly consider it. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

No basis for declaratory relief. —

No case was made showing that plaintiff was entitled to declaratory relief where the requested relief, a declaration that defendants violated a legal duty to abide by the law, enforce the law, or uphold the law, would have no effect upon the rights, status or legal relationship of plaintiff and defendants. Bird v. Rozier, 948 P.2d 888,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1997).

A prayer that the court “make a declaration of rights of the respective parties”

does not alone make the action necessarily one under this chapter. Goodson v. Smith, 69 Wyo. 439, 243 P.2d 163,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1952).

No action for failure to provide credit to contractor erroneously
collecting sales tax. —

A business erroneously collected sales tax from its customers and remitted the same to the state, and was assessed sales and use tax on materials consumed by it as a contractor. When the state failed to provide a credit under former § 39-6-409 (excessive and deficient payments; now see §

39-15-109

) for the sales tax collected, a declaratory judgment action was brought. Such an action was improper, however, as the case did not concern the constitutionality or interpretation of former § 39-6-409, which was not concerned with the granting of credit against a person's liability through the application of moneys resulting from overpayment by third parties. M & B Drilling & Constr. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 706 P.2d 243,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1985).

An action to quiet title is essentially an action for declaratory relief

as contemplated by this section, and a judgment sustained under this section, after a trial of issues raised by pleadings showing a dispute over a title, would not be reversed. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

Construction of statute. —

In an action under this chapter it was held that a statute providing that only taxpayers could vote at bond election was unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Declaratory judgment action was permissible despite the absence of a timely petition for review of an administrative action where the school districts were challenging the department of education's interpretation of §

21-13-102

, the recapture statute. Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole, 6 P.3d 1275,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2000).

Construction of contract. —

Landowners presented a justiciable controversy in filing their complaint seeking a declaratory judgment to settle their rights to water use under their contracts with the town; the case was one of contract construction, not the construction of any right to use water under a permit and appropriation system. Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

Action was properly brought under this chapter by sugar manufacturer for construction of contract with beet growers, and for decree that growers, threatening to sue, had been paid amount due under contract. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Contract entered into between employer and trade union is primarily one, as far as it goes, for benefit of each individual member of the union accepted, unless, perhaps, he dissents, when such member enters into the employment. Beatty v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 49 Wyo. 22, 52 P.2d 404,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1935).

Terminable controversy. —

Declaration may be refused unless it appears that a decision, whichever way it may go, will terminate the uncertainty or controversy. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

A declaratory judgment action is not proper where it will not terminate the controversy. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

Construction of wills. —

Under this chapter district courts have power, upon petition of any person interested, to determine any question of construction or validity arising under a will, to declare rights, status or other legal relations thereunder, and to determine any question arising in administration of an estate. Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

The University of Wyoming and the board of trustees of that institution are immune from suit

under the Declaratory Judgments Act. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyo., 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975).

State, its agencies and its officers may not raise defense of sovereign immunity

to actions under Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act (§§

1-37-101

through

1-37-115

); provided that, if such actions also concern those contract and tort claims which are the subject of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the procedural aspects of that act must be met. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

A declaratory judgment is a binding adjudication

of the rights and status of the litigants even though no consequential relief is awarded. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Applied

in

Ludwig v. Harston, 65 Wyo. 134, 197 P.2d 252,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1948); In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988); Cotton v. Brow, 903 P.2d 530,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1995); Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Sept. 30, 2015).

Quoted

in

Reiman Corp. v. City of Cheyenne, 838 P.2d 1182,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1992).;
; Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(May 17, 2013); Inman v. Inman (In re Estate of Inman), 2016 WY 101, 382 P.3d 67,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2016).

Cited

in

Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1939); Snake River Brewing Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2002 WY 11, 39 P.3d 397,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Federal question jurisdiction in declaratory judgment suit challenging state statute or regulation on grounds of federal preemption, 69 ALR Fed 753.